Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1807.01
General supervision for the purpose of post-degree clinical practice experience, defined.

General supervision for the purpose of post-degree clinical practice experience means the qualified supervisor is onsite and present at the location where nutrition-care services are provided or is immediately available by means of electronic communications to the supervisee providing the services and both maintains continued involvement in the appropriate aspects of patient care and has primary responsibility for all nutrition-care services rendered by the supervisee.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 30.